Idaho, session 2026, S1393.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 32-717C, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
32-717C. ALLEGATIONS OF ABUSE -- INVESTIGATION. (1) When, in any
divorce proceeding or upon request for modification of a divorce decree, an
proceeding affecting child custody or parenting time, a credible allegation
of child abuse or child sexual abuse, neglect, or other criminal acts is
made, implicating either party, the court shall order by a written notice
and request that an investigation be conducted by the department of health
and welfare, or by the appropriate law enforcement agency, if applicable. A
final award of custody, parenting time, or visitation may shall not be ren-
dered until a written report on that investigation is received by the court.
That investigation shall be conducted by the department within thirty (30)
days of the court's notice and request for investigation. The investigating
agency shall make reasonable efforts to complete the investigation and sub-
mit a written report within forty-two (42) calendar days unless extended by
the court upon documented reasonable cause.
(2) If an investigation extends beyond forty-two (42) calendar days,
the investigating agency shall provide written status updates to the court
every fourteen (14) calendar days. Upon receipt of the investigative re-
port, the court shall review whether continued restriction meets the clear
and convincing standard.
(3) During the investigation, the court may issue temporary protective
measures only for good cause and in compliance with 32-717F, Idaho Code. Any
ex parte or temporary order shall state an expiration date and create no pre-
sumption for or against either parent.
(4) Findings regarding allegations shall not be based solely on the
opinions or recommendations of guardians ad litem, evaluators, or other
court-appointed professionals.
(5) A safety plan is a nonbinding, nonadjudicative, temporary proposal
initiated by a governmental entity or government-affiliated actor and shall
be considered solely as protective in nature.


SECTION 2. That Chapter 7, Title 32, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 32-717F, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
32-717F. TEMPORARY AND EX PARTE ORDERS. (1) A court may enter a tem-
porary custody order, but such order shall not remain in effect longer than
forty-nine (49) calendar days, shall create no presumption regarding the
child's best interests, and shall not operate as a de facto permanent modi-
fication.
(2) Any temporary restriction shall expire on the forty-ninth calen-
dar day unless continued by written findings supported by clear and convinc-
ing evidence. Nothing in this subsection shall require repeated evidentiary
hearings where the parties stipulate to continuation or where no party seeks
modification.
(3) An ex parte order restricting custody, parenting time, or contact
may be issued only upon sworn admissible evidence establishing probable
cause of imminent physical danger to the child or a parent. Speculation,
generalized fear, or uncorroborated assertions are insufficient. The court
shall consider known inculpatory and exculpatory evidence.
(4) An ex parte order shall expire fourteen (14) calendar days from is-
suance, shall state on its face the date and time of expiration, and shall not
be extended or converted into a temporary order without a full evidentiary
hearing and written findings.
(5) A court shall not delay resolution of a custody matter such that a
temporary or ex parte order functions as a long-term deprivation of parental
rights.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.